Louisiana, session 2026, HB936.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subpart T of Part I of Chapter 2 of Title 22 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 22:550.41 through 550.68 is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
SUBPART T. CAPTIVE INSURANCE ACT
§550.41. Short title
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Captive

Insurance Act."
§550.42. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the meanings ascribed to
them:
Page 1 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1294 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 936
(1) "Association captive insurer" means a captive insurer that insures risks
of the members of one or more associations and their affiliated companies and
employees, formed and sponsored by those associations.
(2) "Branch captive insurer" means an alien captive insurer licensed to write
insurance in this state, maintaining assets and liabilities related to this state's
operations in a segregated branch account.
(3) "Business plan" means the document submitted with a captive
application describing the proposed insurer's underwriting strategy, risk profile,
capitalization plan, governance structure, and projected financial performance.
(4) "Captive insurer" means any pure captive insurer, association captive
insurer, group captive insurer, sponsored captive insurer, or protected cell company
formed or licensed pursuant to this Chapter.
(5) "Cell" means a separate and distinct account within a protected cell
company established pursuant to this Chapter, with its own separately maintained
assets and liabilities, owned by one or more participants and maintained separate
from all other cells and from the protected cell company's general account.
(6) "Cell owner" means a participant who owns or has an equity interest in
a cell of a protected cell company.
(7) "Core account" means the assets and liabilities of a protected cell
company that are not attributable to any cell.
(8) "Fronting insurer" means a licensed insurer that issues policies on behalf
of a captive insurer through a contractual arrangement, retaining no or minimal risk.
(9) "Group captive insurer" means a captive insurer owned by two or more
unaffiliated companies or persons that insures only the risks of its owners, their
affiliated companies, or the risks of members of an industry group.
(10) "Inactive captive" means a captive insurer that has ceased writing new
insurance and is in the process of winding down its affairs.
(11) "Minimum capital" means the minimum paid-in capital required for
formation and ongoing operation of a captive insurer as specified in this Chapter.
Page 2 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1294 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 936
(12) "Minimum surplus" means the minimum surplus required for formation
and ongoing operation of a captive insurer as specified in this Chapter.
(13) "Participant" means a person who is insured by a sponsored captive
insurer under a participant contract, or who holds an ownership interest in a cell of
a protected cell company.
(14) "Participant contract" means the agreement between a sponsored captive
insurer and a participant that defines the terms of the participant's access to the
sponsored captive's facilities.
(15) "Protected cell" has the same meaning as "cell."
(16) "Protected cell company" or "PCC" means a captive insurer that
maintains two or more separate cells, each with distinct assets and liabilities
attributed to individual participants, segregated from all other cells and from the
general assets of the protected cell company.
(17) "Pure captive insurer" means a captive insurer that insures only the risks
of its parent, affiliated companies, or controlled unaffiliated entities.
(18) "Sponsor" means the entity that owns and operates a sponsored captive
insurer and provides the required capital for the sponsored captive's general account.
(19) "Sponsored captive insurer" means a captive insurer that insures the
risks of participants through separate participant accounts, with the sponsor
providing the general account capital.
§550.43. Authority to form; types of captive insurers authorized
A. The following types of captive insurers may be formed and licensed in
this state pursuant to this Subpart:
(1) Pure captive insurers.
(2) Association captive insurers.
(3) Group captive insurers.
(4) Sponsored captive insurers.
(5) Protected cell companies.
(6) Branch captive insurers.
Page 3 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1294 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 936
B. A captive insurer may be incorporated as a stock insurer, a mutual insurer,
a limited liability company, or such other entity as may be approved by the
commissioner.
C. A captive insurer may be formed under the laws of this state or may be
a foreign or alien captive seeking licensure as a branch captive insurer in this state.
§550.44. Application for license
A. A captive insurer seeking a license to do business in this state shall file
with the commissioner a written application for a license, accompanied by the
applicable fee. The application shall include:
(1) A copy of the proposed organizational documents, including articles of
incorporation or organization and bylaws or operating agreement.
(2) A business plan meeting the requirements of this Chapter.
(3) Evidence of the required minimum capital and surplus.
(4) A pro forma balance sheet and income statement for the first three years
of operation.
(5) The name and qualifications of the proposed captive manager, if any.
(6) The name and qualifications of the proposed actuary.
(7) A description of the risks to be insured.
(8) Information regarding proposed reinsurance arrangements, if any.
(9) Such other information as the commissioner may require by rule.
B. All applications shall be reviewed by the commissioner, who may, as part
of the review process, conduct an examination of the proposed captive, require
additional information, or hold a hearing.
C. The commissioner shall approve or deny an application within ninety
days of receipt of a complete application. If the commissioner fails to act within
ninety days, the application shall be deemed approved.
D. The commissioner shall approve a license if the commissioner determines
that:
(1) The applicant meets all requirements of this Chapter and applicable rules.
Page 4 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1294 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 936
(2) The proposed business plan is sound and the proposed captive is likely
to meet its obligations to insureds.
(3) The proposed captive will not be used for purposes contrary to the
interests of the public or the integrity of the insurance market.
§550.45. Minimum capital and surplus requirements
A. The minimum capital and surplus requirements for captive insurers
licensed pursuant to this Chapter are as follows:
(1) Pure captive insurer: minimum capital of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars and minimum surplus of two hundred fifty thousand dollars for a combined
minimum of five hundred thousand dollars.
(2) Association captive insurer: minimum capital of five hundred thousand
dollars and minimum surplus of five hundred thousand dollars for a combined
minimum of one million dollars.
(3) Group captive insurer: minimum capital of five hundred thousand dollars
and minimum surplus of five hundred thousand dollars for a combined minimum of
one million dollars.
(4) Sponsored captive insurer: minimum capital of five hundred thousand
dollars and minimum surplus of five hundred thousand dollars for the general
account.
(5) Protected cell company: minimum capital and surplus for the core
account of two hundred fifty thousand dollars with a minimum of one hundred
thousand dollars of capital and surplus attributable to each cell.
B. The commissioner may, by rule or order, establish higher capital and
surplus requirements for a particular captive insurer based on the type, volume, or
nature of insurance business transacted, or other relevant risk factors.
C. Capital and surplus may be contributed in the form of cash, letters of
credit from financial institutions approved by the commissioner, trust arrangements,
or such other forms of security as the commissioner may approve.
Page 5 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1294 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 936
D. The commissioner shall annually review the adequacy of minimum
capital and surplus requirements and shall adjust them as necessary to reflect
changes in economic conditions, actuarial standards, or market practices.
§550.46. Licensing fees
A. Captive insurers shall pay to the Department the following fees:
(1) Initial application fee of two thousand five hundred dollars for a pure
captive insurer; five thousand dollars for an association, group, or sponsored captive
insurer; and seven thousand five hundred dollars for a protected cell company.
(2) Annual renewal fee: the same as the initial application fee.
(3) Cell addition fee for protected cell companies: five hundred dollars per
cell added after initial licensing.
B. Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a special fund
established for use by the Department in administering this Chapter and developing
this state's captive industry.
§550.47. Formation of protected cell companies
A. A protected cell company shall be formed under the laws of this state as
a single legal entity with the authority to establish and maintain two or more cells for
the purpose of insuring the risks of cell owners.
B. The organizational documents of a protected cell company shall:
(1) Identify the company as a protected cell company.
(2) Authorize the establishment and maintenance of cells.
(3) Require that the assets of each cell be segregated from the assets of all
other cells and from the general assets of the protected cell company.
(4) Prohibit the assets attributable to a cell from being charged with the
liabilities of any other cell or the general liabilities of the protected cell company.
(5) Specify the rights and obligations of cell owners with respect to their
cells.
§550.48. Cell establishment and governance
Page 6 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1294 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 936
A. A protected cell company may establish one or more cells with the prior
written approval of the commissioner. Each cell shall be established pursuant to a
written cell agreement that specifies:
(1) The identity and ownership interest of the cell owner.
(2) The risks to be insured through the cell.
(3) The minimum capital and surplus to be maintained in the cell.
(4) The rights of the cell owner regarding management and control of the
cell.
(5) The circumstances under which the cell may be terminated.
(6) The allocation of investment income, underwriting profits and losses, and
expenses between the cell and the core account.
B. Each cell shall maintain separate books of account and financial records.
The protected cell company shall maintain a clear accounting separation between the
assets and liabilities of each cell and the core account.
C. The name of each cell shall include the name of the protected cell
company and a designation that identifies the particular cell.
§550.49. Segregation of cell assets; core account
A. The assets of each cell of a protected cell company shall be:
(1) Held separately from the assets of all other cells and the core account.
(2) Used only to pay losses and expenses attributable to risks insured by that
cell.
(3) Not subject to the claims of creditors of any other cell or of the protected
cell company in its general capacity, except as provided in Subsection C of this
Section.
B. The assets of the core account may be used to meet obligations of the
protected cell company that are not attributable to any individual cell, including
administrative expenses, formation costs, and regulatory compliance obligations.
C. Notwithstanding the general rule of segregation, the assets of the core
account may be used to satisfy the obligations of a cell if:
Page 7 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1294 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 936
(1) The cell assets are insufficient to satisfy those obligations.
(2) The cell agreement expressly permits such use.
(3) The commissioner has approved such use in writing.
D. No judgment against a protected cell company with respect to obligations
attributable to a particular cell shall be enforceable against the assets of any other
cell or the core account, except as provided in this Section.
§550.50. Small carrier group captive provisions
A. In recognition of the market access challenges faced by small commercial
transportation carriers, the commissioner shall:
(1) Develop expedited application procedures for protected cell companies
sponsored by trade associations whose members consist primarily of small
commercial carriers, defined as carriers operating five or fewer vehicles.
(2) Allow reduced minimum cell capitalization requirements of fifty
thousand dollars per cell for cells owned by carriers meeting the definition of a small
carrier.
(3) Provide technical assistance to trade associations seeking to establish
group captive or protected cell structures for their members.
B. Trade associations sponsoring captive structures under this section shall
be required to demonstrate adequate financial strength, governance capacity, and
actuarial support to manage the captive responsibly.
C. The commissioner shall prepare and publish annually a report on small
carrier captive activity in this state, including the number of small carriers accessing
captive coverage, the premium savings achieved, and recommendations for program
improvements.
§550.51. Governance requirements
A. Each captive insurer shall maintain a board of directors or equivalent
governing body with a minimum of three members, at least one of whom shall be a
resident of this state.
B. The governing body shall:
Page 8 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1294 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 936
(1) Meet at least annually, with a quorum present.
(2) Adopt and maintain a written governance policy.
(3) Oversee the captive's financial condition and compliance with this
Chapter.
(4) Review and approve the annual actuarial report.
(5) Maintain minutes of all meetings, available for inspection by the
commissioner.
C. A captive insurer may employ a captive manager licensed by the
commissioner to perform day-to-day management functions. The use of a captive
manager does not relieve the governing body of its oversight responsibilities.
§550.52. Captive managers; licensing
A. No person shall act as a captive manager in this state without first
obtaining a captive manager license from the commissioner.
B. A captive manager license applicant shall demonstrate:
(1) Relevant experience in insurance, risk management, or captive
management.
(2) Financial responsibility and sound business practices.
(3) Compliance with applicable education requirements established by the
commissioner.
(4) Payment of the required license fee.
C. A captive manager license shall be renewed annually. The commissioner
may revoke or suspend a license for cause following notice and an opportunity for
a hearing.
D. The commissioner shall, through rule, establish standards of conduct for
captive managers, including fiduciary duties to captive insurers and their
policyholders.
§550.53. Actuarial requirements
Page 9 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1294 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 936
A. Each captive insurer shall retain a qualified actuary, who shall be a
Fellow of the Casualty Actuarial Society, a Fellow of the Society of Actuaries, or a
member in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries.
B. The actuary shall annually prepare and certify a statement of actuarial
opinion addressing:
(1) The adequacy of the captive's loss reserves.
(2) The appropriateness of the captive's premium pricing relative to the risks
insured.
(3) The captive's projected solvency for the upcoming year.
(4) Any significant actuarial risks or concerns identified by the actuary.
C. The actuarial opinion shall be submitted to the commissioner as part of
the annual report required under this Chapter.
§550.54. Investment requirements
A. A captive insurer shall invest its assets in accordance with a written
investment policy approved by its governing body and the commissioner.
B. The investment policy shall provide for:
(1) Preservation of capital as the primary investment objective.
(2) Diversification appropriate to the nature and duration of the captive's
liabilities.
(3) Liquidity sufficient to meet expected claims obligations.
(4) Compliance with applicable investment standards established by the
commissioner.
C. A captive insurer shall not invest more than ten percent of its admitted
assets in the securities of any single issuer, other than obligations of the United
States government.
§550.55. Reinsurance
A. A captive insurer may obtain reinsurance from any insurer authorized to
transact reinsurance in this state or from a reinsurer approved by the commissioner.
Page 10 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1294 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 936
B. A captive insurer may cede one hundred percent of its risks to a reinsurer
if the reinsurance arrangement is approved by the commissioner and the captive
retains sufficient financial substance to meet its direct obligations to insureds.
C. Reinsurance recoverables shall be admitted as assets only to the extent
that the reinsurer meets credit for reinsurance standards established by the
commissioner.
§550.56. Annual report
A. Each captive insurer shall file an annual report with the commissioner no
later than April thirtieth of each year. The annual report shall include:
(1) Annual financial statements audited by an independent certified public
accountant licensed in this state or another state acceptable to the commissioner.
(2) The actuarial opinion required under Section 1314.
(3) A statement of any material changes in the captive's business plan,
ownership, or governance.
(4) A description of any claims or losses that individually exceeded ten
percent of the captive's surplus.
(5) Such other information as the commissioner may require by rule.
B. Protected cell companies shall include in their annual report separate
financial statements for each cell and for the core account.
C. The commissioner may, for good cause shown, grant an extension of the
filing deadline not to exceed sixty days.
§550.57. Examination authority
A. The commissioner may examine the affairs of any captive insurer at any
time the commissioner deems it necessary for the protection of policyholders or the
public.
B. The commissioner shall conduct a routine examination of each captive
insurer at least once every five years.
Page 11 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1294 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 936
C. The costs of any examination shall be borne by the captive insurer being
examined, except that the commissioner may waive examination costs for small
captives upon a finding that such waiver is in the public interest.
D. Examination reports shall be confidential and not subject to public
disclosure, except that the commissioner may share examination reports with other
insurance regulatory authorities.
§550.58. Confidentiality of captive information
A. All financial information, reports, and business plans submitted to the
commissioner pursuant to this Chapter shall be confidential and not subject to public
records disclosure under this state's law.
B. The commissioner may share confidential captive information with the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners or with the insurance regulatory
authorities of another state or jurisdiction under a written agreement of
confidentiality.
C. The confidentiality provisions of this section shall not be construed to
prevent the commissioner from disclosing to the public aggregate data regarding the
this state's captive market that does not identify individual captives.
§550.59. Premium tax
A. Each captive insurer licensed in this state shall pay to the Department of
Revenue an annual premium tax on direct premiums written on this state's risks,
computed as follows:
(1) Four-tenths of one percent on the first twenty million dollars of direct
premiums.
(2) Three-tenths of one percent on the next twenty million dollars of direct
premiums.
(3) Two-tenths of one percent on the next twenty million dollars of direct
premiums.
(4) One-tenth of one percent on direct premiums in excess of sixty million
dollars.
Page 12 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1294 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 936
B. The minimum annual premium tax payable by any captive insurer under
this section shall be five thousand dollars.
C. Captive insurers are exempt from any other premium tax, surplus lines
tax, or fire marshal tax that would otherwise apply to insurance transactions.
D. Premium taxes paid pursuant to this section shall not be subject to
retaliatory tax provisions applicable to other insurers.
§550.60. Grounds for regulatory action
A. The commissioner may suspend, revoke, or place in conservatorship a
captive insurer upon a finding that:
(1) The captive insurer has failed to maintain the required minimum capital
or surplus.
(2) The captive insurer has materially misrepresented information in its
application, annual report, or other regulatory filing.
(3) The captive insurer is in a financially hazardous condition.
(4) The captive insurer's management has engaged in conduct that is
hazardous to policyholders or the public.
(5) The captive insurer has failed to comply with any requirement of this
Chapter or applicable rules.
(6) The captive insurer has failed to pay claims in a timely manner.
B. Prior to taking action under this Section, the commissioner shall provide
the captive insurer with written notice of the proposed action and an opportunity for
a hearing within thirty days, unless the commissioner determines that an emergency
exists requiring immediate action.
§550.61. Civil penalties
A. A captive insurer that violates any provision of this Chapter or any rule
promulgated hereunder shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five
thousand dollars per violation.
B. A person who acts as a captive manager without a license shall be subject
to a civil penalty not to exceed fifty thousand dollars per violation.
Page 13 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1294 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 936
C. All penalties collected under this Section shall be deposited in the
Department's captive insurance development fund.
§550.62. Receivership and liquidation
A. A captive insurer that is determined to be insolvent or in hazardous
financial condition shall be subject to the receivership and liquidation provisions of
this state's insurance law to the extent consistent with this Chapter.
B. In the event of a protected cell company's insolvency, the assets of each
cell shall be applied first to the obligations of that cell. Only after the cell's
obligations are satisfied may remaining cell assets be applied to the obligations of
the core account or other cells, and only to the extent authorized by the cell
agreement and approved by the commissioner.
C. Captive insurers are not required to participate in the Louisiana Insurance
Guaranty Association (LIGA). Policyholders of captive insurers are not entitled to
LIGA guaranty fund protection.
§550.63. Louisiana Captive Insurance Development Fund
A. There is hereby created in the state treasury a special fund to be known
as the Louisiana Captive Insurance Development Fund.
B. The fund shall receive:
(1) All application and renewal fees collected under this Chapter.
(2) Civil penalties collected under Section 1322.
(3) Such other appropriations or transfers as the Legislature may provide.
C. Monies in the fund shall be used by the commissioner to:
(1) Hire and retain specialized staff for captive regulation, including
actuaries, financial analysts, and legal counsel.
(2) Market this state as a captive domicile at national and international
insurance industry events.
(3) Develop technical assistance programs for small businesses, minority-
owned enterprises, and trade associations seeking to form captives.
(4) Fund research and education on captive insurance and risk management.
Page 14 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1294 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 936
§550.64. Captive Insurance Advisory Committee
A. The commissioner shall establish a Captive Insurance Advisory
Committee to advise the commissioner on the development and administration of
this state's captive insurance market.
B. The advisory committee shall consist of twelve members appointed by
the commissioner, including:
(1) Two captive insurance managers licensed in this state.
(2) Two representatives of this state's trade associations with captive or self-
insurance programs.
(3) One licensed actuary with captive insurance experience.
(4) One attorney specializing in insurance law.
(5) One certified public accountant with insurance industry experience.
(6) One representative of small or minority-owned businesses.
(7) One representative from the commercial transportation industry.
(8) One representative from the financial services industry.
(9) One member of the general public.
(10) One representative from this state's institution of higher education with
an insurance or risk management program.
C. The advisory committee shall meet at least twice annually and shall
provide the commissioner with written recommendations on captive regulatory
policy, fee structures, and economic development strategies.
§550.65. Rulemaking authority
The commissioner shall have authority to promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to implement the provisions of this Chapter, including rules governing
application procedures, capital and surplus requirements, investment standards,
captive manager licensing, governance requirements, and examination procedures.
§550.66. Exemption from other insurance laws
Page 15 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1294 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 936
A. Captive insurers licensed pursuant to this Chapter are exempt from all
provisions of the Louisiana Insurance Code applicable to admitted insurers, except
as specifically provided in this Chapter or by rule of the commissioner.
B. Captive insurers shall not be subject to this state's surplus lines laws with
respect to business written by the captive on risks of its owner, members, or
participants.
C. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to exempt captive insurers
from laws of general applicability, including laws governing fraud, deceptive trade
practices, and contractual obligations.
§550.67. Applicability of other provisions
To the extent not inconsistent with this Chapter, the provisions of this state's
insurance law relating to insurer formation, corporate governance, and financial
regulation shall apply to captive insurers. In the event of a conflict between this
Chapter and other provisions of this state's insurance law, this Chapter shall control.
Section 2. This Act shall take effect upon signature by the Governor, or, if not
signed by the Governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without
the Governor's signature, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution
of Louisiana.